src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj-noere_stoere_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Adj - noere: # adj. on -e
    noere+A+Attr: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Nom: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Gen: noeren
    noere+A+Sg+Acc: noerem
    noere+A+Sg+Ill: noerese
    noere+A+Sg+Ine: noeresne
    noere+A+Sg+Ela: noereste
    noere+A+Sg+Com: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Nom: noerh
    noere+A+Pl+Gen: noeri
    noere+A+Pl+Acc: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ill: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ine: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Ela: noerijste
    noere+A+Pl+Com: noerigujmie
    noere+A+Ess: noerine
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [nuerebe, noerebe]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [nuerebe, noerebe]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: [nuereben, noereben]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: [nuerebem, noerebem] 
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: [nueriebasse, noerebasse]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ine: [nueriebisnie, noerebisnie]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ela: [nueriebistie, noerebistie]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: [nueriebinie, noerebinie]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: [nuerebh, noerebh] 
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [nueriebidie, noerebidie]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: [nuerebi, noerebi, noerebij] 
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: [nueriebidie, noerebidie]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ine: [nueriebinie, noerebinie] 
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ela: [nueriebijstie, noerebijstie] 
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [nuerebigujmie, noerebigujmie]
    noere+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: [nueriebinie, noerebinie]
        
  Adj - noere: # adj. on -e  # Sørlig- Røros, 
    noere+A+Attr: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Nom: noere
    noere+A+Sg+Gen: noeren
    noere+A+Sg+Acc: noerem
    noere+A+Sg+Ill: noerese
    noere+A+Sg+Ine: noeresne
    noere+A+Sg+Ela: noereste
    noere+A+Sg+Com: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Nom: noerh
    noere+A+Pl+Gen: noeri
    noere+A+Pl+Acc: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ill: noeride
    noere+A+Pl+Ine: noerine
    noere+A+Pl+Ela: noerijste
    noere+A+Pl+Com: noerigujmie
    noere+A+Ess: noerine
        
    
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Attr: [noeremes, nööremes]
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [noeremes, nööremes] # nööremos, noeremos
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: [noeremassen, nööremassen] # nööremossen, noeremossen
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: [noeremassem, nööremassem] #nööremossem, noeremossem
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: [noeremassese, nööremassese] # nööremossese, noeremossese
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ine: [noeremassesne, nööremassesne]  # nööremossesne, noeremossesne
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ela: [noeremasseste, nööremasseste] # nööremosseste, noeremosseste
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: [noeremassine, nööremassine] # nööremossine, noeremossine
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: [noeremassh, nööremassh]  # nööremosh, noeremosh
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: [noeremasside, nööremasside]  # nööremosside, noeremosside
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: [noeremassi, nööremassi] # nööremossi, noeremossi
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: [noeremasside, nööremasside] # nööremosside, noeremosside
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ine: [noeremassine, nööremassine] # nööremossine,noeremossine
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ela: [noeremassijste, nööremassijste]  # nööremossijste, noeremossijste
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [noeremassigujmie, nööremassigujmie]  # nööremossigujmie, noeremossigujmie
    noere+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess:  [noeremassine, nööremassine] # nööremossine, noeremossine 


  Adj - stoere: # adj. on -e # både nordlig + sørlig
    stoere+A+Attr: [stoerre, stoere]
    stoere+A+Sg+Nom: [stoerre, stoere]
    stoere+A+Sg+Gen: [stoerren, stoeren]
    stoere+A+Sg+Acc: [stoerrem, stoerem]
    stoere+A+Sg+Ill: [stoerrese, stoerese]
    stoere+A+Sg+Ine: [stoerresne, stoeresne]
    stoere+A+Sg+Ela: [stoerreste, stoereste]
    stoere+A+Sg+Com: [stoerrine, stoerine]
    stoere+A+Pl+Nom: [stoerh, stoerrh]
    stoere+A+Pl+Gen: [stoerri, stoeri]
    stoere+A+Pl+Acc: [stoerride, stoeride]
    stoere+A+Pl+Ill: [stoerride, stoeride]
    stoere+A+Pl+Ine: [stoerrine, stoerine]
    stoere+A+Pl+Ela: [stoerrijste, stoerijste]
    stoere+A+Pl+Com: [stoerrigujmie, stoerigujmie]
    stoere+A+Ess: [stoerrine, stoerine]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Attr: [stuerebe, stoerebe]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [stuerebe, stoerebe]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Gen: [stuereben, stoereben]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Acc: [stuerebem, stoerebem]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ill: [stueriebasse, stoerebasse]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ine: [stueriebisnie, stoerebisnie] # ikke stoeriebisnie
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Ela: [stueriebistie, stoerebistie]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Com: [stueriebinie, stoerebinie]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Nom: [stuerebh, stoerebh]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [stueriebidie, stoerebidie]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Gen: [stuerebi, stoerebi] # subformer stoerebij,stuerebij  OBS! OBS! 
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ill: [stueriebidie, stoerebidie]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ine: [stueriebinie, stoerebinie]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Ela: [stueriebijstie, stoerebijstie]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Com: [stuerebigujmie, stoerebigujmie]
    stoere+A+Der/Comp+A+Ess: [stueriebinie, stoerebinie]
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Attr: [stööremes, stoeremes]
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [stööremes, stoeremes]
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Gen: [stööremassen, stoeremassen] # stoeremossen
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Acc: [stööremassem, stoeremassem] # stoeremossen
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ill: [stööremassese, stoeremassese] # stoeremossese
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ine: [stööremassesne, stoeremassesne] # stoeremossesne
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Ela: [stööremasseste, stoeremasseste] # stoeremosseste
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Com: [stööremassine, stoeremassine] # stoeremosseste
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Nom: [stööremassh, stoeremassh]
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Acc: [stööremasside, stoeremasside]  # stoeremosside
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Gen: [stööremassi, stoeremassi] # stoeremossi
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ill: [stööremasside, stoeremasside] # stoeremosside
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ine: [stööremassine, stoeremassine] # stoeremossine
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Ela: [stööremassijste, stoeremassijste]  #  stoeremossijste
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Com: [stööremassigujmie, stoeremassigujmie] #  stoeremossigujmie
    stoere+A+Der/Superl+A+Ess: [stööremassine, stoeremassine] # stoeremossine
